src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-us_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - pappus : #  o-stem
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: pappus
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: pappus
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: pappuske
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: pappusta
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: pappuha
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: pappusko
    pappus+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [pappuskiiro, pappuskiire, pappuskiiri]
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: pappuja
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: pappujen
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: pappujenge
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: pappujenna
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: pappujensa
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: pappujengo
    pappus+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [pappujengiiro, pappujengiire, pappujengiiri]
